Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2394YC (3) 91 nls/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 514C.4A, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0c. âCost-sharingâ means any coverage limit, 3 copayment, coinsurance, deductible, or other out-of-pocket cost 4 obligation imposed by a policy, contract, or plan providing for 5 third-party payment or prepayment of health or medical expenses 6 on a covered person. 7 Sec. 2. Section 514C.4A, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 8 by adding the following new paragraph: 9 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. Cost-sharing requirements imposed 10 for coverage required under this section shall not be less 11 favorable than cost-sharing requirements imposed by a health 12 carrier for screening mammograms. 13 Sec. 3. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to third-party 14 payment provider contracts, policies, or plans delivered, 15 issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this state on or 16 after January 1, 2026. 17